Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.080

Adoption of budget.

Adoption of the omnibus appropriation bill or bills by the legislature shall constitute adoption of the budget and the making of appropriations therefor. A budget for state government shall be finally adopted not later than thirty calendar days prior to the beginning of the ensuing biennium.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 100 s 5; 1965 c 8 s 43.88.080. Prior: 1959 c 328 s 8.]